Illinois, session 104th, SB921.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom from Drone Surveillance Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 167/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Freedom from Drone Surveillance Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-569, eff. 1-1-14.)